Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202673-1202
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Service Contract Reporting Act:

(1) City means a city of the metropolitan class;

(2) County means a county in this state with a population of more than five hundred thousand inhabitants as determined by the most recent federal decennial census;

(3) Division means the materiel division of the Department of Administrative Services;

(4) Fiscal year means the twelve-month period used by the city, county, or state agency for budgeting purposes;

(5) Service contract means a contract that:

(a) Is awarded by a city, county, or state agency for the provision of legal services, accounting services, financial consulting services, management consulting services, health care services, engineering services, architectural services, information technology services, marketing and advertising services, human resources consulting services, environmental consulting services, educational and training services, snow removal and hauling services, janitorial services, custodial and cleaning services, yard maintenance services, or tree removal services; and

(b) Has a value of:

(i) For contracts entered into prior to January 1, 2029, seventy thousand dollars or more;

(ii) For contracts entered into on or after January 1, 2029, and prior to January 1, 2034, ninety thousand dollars or more; or

(iii) For contracts entered into on or after January 1, 2034, one hundred ten thousand dollars or more;

(6) State agency means any agency, board, or commission of this state other than the University of Nebraska, the Nebraska state colleges, the courts, the Legislature, or any officer or state agency established by the Constitution of Nebraska;

(7) State aid means:

(a) For both cities and counties, state aid paid pursuant to sections 60-3,202 and 77-3523;

(b) For cities, state aid to cities paid pursuant to sections 39-2501 to 39-2520, 60-3,190, and 77-27,139.04 and insurance premium tax paid to cities; and

(c) For counties, state aid to counties paid pursuant to sections 60-3,184 to 60-3,190, insurance premium tax paid to counties, and reimbursements to counties from funds appropriated pursuant to section 29-3933; and

(8) Zip code means the numerical code used by the United States Postal Service to identify geographic areas.

Laws 2026, LB1135, § 2.
July 18, 2026